West Virginia, session 2026, HB5111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. General administration. §18B-4-11.  Prohibition on higher education vaccine mandates. (a) The purpose of this act is to ensure that students, faculty, and staff have the right to make personal health decisions regarding vaccinations at state higher education institutions. (b) Definitions.(1) For the purposes of this act:"Higher education institution" refers to any public or private institution that offers postsecondary education, including universities, colleges, and community and technical colleges operating under Chapter 18B of this code."Vaccine mandate" refers to any legal requirement or policy that mandates individuals receive a vaccine as a condition for enrollment, employment, or participation in any campus activities or services."Vaccination" refers to the administration of a vaccine designed to prevent a particular disease or illness, as approved by public health authorities.(c) No higher education institution may impose a vaccine mandate on its students, faculty, or staff as a condition of enrollment, employment, or participation in any educational activity or service provided by the institution. (d) No higher education institution may offer any reward, monetary or otherwise, as an incentive to its students, faculty, or staff for receiving a vaccination, immunization, or any medical procedure.  (e) Higher education institution may offer to students, faculty, or staff, vaccinations or immunizations, free of charge: Provided, That any vaccines administered on the premises of a higher education institution shall be provided with informed consent.   (f) Students, faculty, and staff shall not be denied access to educational programs, services, or employment opportunities based solely on their decision to opt out of vaccination.(g) If any provision of this section is held invalid, the remainder of the provisions shall not be affected.(h) This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.